Maine, session 132, LD216.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §2, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2019, c. 475, §11, is further amended
to read:
The first regular session of the Legislature, after its convening, shall must adjourn no
later than the 3rd Wednesday in June and the 2nd second regular session of the Legislature
shall must adjourn no later than the 3rd Wednesday preceding the 3rd Monday in April.
The Legislature, in case of emergency, may by a vote of 2/3 of the members of each House
present and voting, extend the date for adjournment for the first or 2nd second regular
session by no more than 5 legislative days, and in case of further emergency, may by a vote
of 2/3 of the members of each House present and voting, further extend the date for
adjournment by 5 additional legislative days. The times dates for adjournment for the first
and 2nd second regular sessions may also be extended for one additional legislative day for
the purpose of considering possible objections of the Governor to any bill or resolution
presented to the Governor by the Legislature under the Constitution of Maine, Article IV,
Part Third, Section 2.